North Carolina statutes. Chapter 81A. Weights and Measures Act of 1975.
Article 6. Scale Technician.

§ 81A-70.
Purpose of Article.

The purpose of this Article shall be to protect the owners and users of scales and weighing devices in their needs for scale repair and service, and to provide for scale technician registration.

History.

1941, c. 237, s. 1; 1947, c. 380; 1975, c. 544; 1983, c. 111, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the 1941 act, see 19 N.C.L. Rev. 447 (1941).

§ 81A-71.
Prerequisites for scale technician.

It shall be unlawful for any scale technician to render service as a scale technician until after he or she has compiled with the following requirements:

Obtained from the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services a copy of this Article, a copy of regulations pertinent to said Article, and an application form for registration.

to (4) Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 111, s. 2, effective July 1, 1983.

(5)

Obtained a registration card or certificate from the Commissioner or his authorized agent and a model form of service certificate.

(6)

Obtained from the Department an annual certification of the standards of weight which will be used by the scale technician.

The provisions of this Article shall not apply to a full-time employee who renders service only on a scale or weighing device, or on scales or weighing devices, owned solely by his or her employer unless additional pay or compensation is received for such service.

History.

1941, c. 237, s. 3; 1947, c. 380; 1975, c. 544; 1983, c. 111, s. 2; 1997-261, s. 10.

§ 81A-72.
Registration; certificate of registration; annual renewal.

The Commissioner or his authorized agent shall register any person who has complied with the requirements of this Article by making a record of receipt of application, and the issuing of a certificate or card of registration to applicant, whereupon the applicant becomes a registered scale technician and shall be known thereafter as such. Such registration shall be in effect from date of registration until July 1 next and shall be renewed on the first day of July of each year thereafter. A fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) shall accompany each application for registration and each annual registration renewal.

History.

1941, c. 237, ss. 4, 5; 1943, c. 543; 1947, c. 380; 1975, c. 544; 1983, c. 111, s. 3; 2005-276, s. 42.1(g).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 42.1(g), effective September 1, 2005, added the last sentence.

§ 81A-73.
Service certificate.

Whenever any service is rendered on any scale or weighing device used or intended to be used in this State by a scale technician, a certificate shall be issued by such scale technician who rendered said service, which shall be known as a “service certificate.” The size and form of said service certificate shall be determined by the Commissioner or his authorized agent. Inclusive of other pertinent information or statements, the said certificate shall bear a statement expressed in ink or other indelible substance naming the kind of service rendered, whether adjustment, installation, repair, or maintenance, and stating that a service test as defined under the term “service” has been made, and that the service rendered is guaranteed to be as represented. The service certificate shall be made out in triplicate, with original going to the owner of such scale of weighing device or his agent, and a duplicate shall be sent to the Commissioner or his authorized agent and the triplicate copy shall be retained by the scale technician issuing such certificate.

History.

1947, c. 380; 1975, c. 544; 1983, c. 111, s. 4.

§ 81A-74.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 111, s. 5.

§ 81A-75.
Scale removal.

When a scale or weighing device is removed from the premises where located by a scale technician, the scale technician or his servant or agent shall issue a receipt for said scale or weighing device, on which shall be written in ink or other indelible substance the name and address of the owner, the name and address of receiving agent, date of receipt, anticipated date of return, name or make of scale, and such other information pertinent to its identification. The form of receipt shall be approved by the Commissioner or his authorized agent.

History.

1947, c. 380; 1975, c. 544.

§ 81A-76.
Control of condemned or rejected scale.

It shall be unlawful for any owner of a scale or weighing device which has been condemned or rejected by the Commissioner or his authorized agent to either use or dispose of same in any manner other than at the direction of the Commissioner or his authorized agent; provided, however, said rejected scale or weighing device may be removed from the premises temporarily for repairs or service only.

History.

1947, c. 380; 1975, c. 544.

§ 81A-77.
Secondhand scale.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, or offer for sale, or put into use, a secondhand or rebuilt or reconditioned scale or weighing device unless said scale shall have been tested and approved by the Commissioner or his authorized agent, or shall be accompanied by a service certificate as provided for in this Article. Said service certificate shall be retained by the purchaser or user of said scale until an inspector of weights and measures has tested and approved such secondhand scale. The said certificate shall serve as proof of the accuracy of scale at the time scale was purchased or put into service. A secondhand or rebuilt or reconditioned scale or weighing device as referred to in this section shall be considered as being a scale or weighing device in the channels of trade which does not belong to the previous user.

History.

1947, c. 380; 1975, c. 544.

§ 81A-78.
Scale location.

It shall be unlawful for any scale or weighing device to be installed, set up, put into service, or used on a foundation or support that aids in giving false indication of weight values applied to platter, platform, or other load receiving element.

History.

1947, c. 380; 1975, c. 544.

§ 81A-79.
Exemption.

The provisions of this Article shall not prohibit the user of a scale or weighing device from employing some person other than a scale technician to render service as defined by this Article upon his or her scale or weighing device, nor apply to the person so employed, who does not solicit such employment, provided that said user shall not be relieved of his or her responsibility or liability concerning the accuracy of the scale or weighing device after service has been rendered.

History.

1947, c. 380; 1975, c. 544.

§ 81A-80.
Suspension or revocation of registration; penalty.

The Commissioner may suspend or revoke the registration of any scale technician who violates any provisions of this Article or regulations adopted thereunder or who shall fail to issue a service certificate or who shall issue a service certificate bearing false statements regarding service rendered.

Any person who violates any provision of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1941, c. 237, s. 7; 1947, c. 380; 1949, c. 983, s. 2; 1975, c. 544; 1983, c. 111, s. 6; 1993, c. 539, s. 594; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§§ 81A-81 through 81A-85.

Reserved for future codification purposes.